California, session 20252026, SB798.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 929 of the Military and Veterans Code is amended to read:929. The necessary expenses, not to exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350), one thousand dollars ($1,000), for burial or cremation of any indigent veteran may be paid out of the money available under this article.